Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2696.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of October 24, 2018 (P.L.733, No.118), known as the Assistance and Service Animal Integrity Act, is amended by adding a chapter heading to read:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 2. Section 1 of the act is renumbered to read:Section [1] 101. Short title.12345678910111213141516171819202122 This act shall be known and may be cited as the Assistance and Service Animal Integrity Act.Section 3. Section 2 of the act is repealed:[Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Assistance animal." An animal, other than a service animal, that qualifies as a reasonable accommodation under the Fair Housing Act (Public Law 90-284, 42 U.S.C. § 3601 et seq.), section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (Public Law 93-112, 29 U.S.C. § 701 et seq.) or local law. The term includes an emotional support animal when the animal qualifies as a reasonable accommodation."Association." The owners association established to operate a condominium, cooperative or planned community located in this Commonwealth."Disability." A physical or mental impairment which substantially limits one or more major life activities."Service animal." An animal, other than an assistance animal, that qualifies as a service animal under the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327) or as a guide or support animal under the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, or local law.]Section 4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20260HB2696PN3775 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Disability." A physical or mental impairment which substantially limits one or more major life activities."Service dog." A dog individually trained to do work or perform tasks for the benefit of an individual with a disability.Section 5. The act is amended by adding a chapter heading to read:CHAPTER 3ANIMAL ASSISTANCE IN HOUSINGSection 6. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 301. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Assistance animal." An animal, other than a service animal, that qualifies as a reasonable accommodation under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 45 (relating to fair housing), 29 U.S.C. Ch. 16 (relating to vocational rehabilitation and other rehabilitation services) or local law. The term includes an emotional support animal when the animal qualifies as a reasonable accommodation."Association." The owners association established to operate a condominium, cooperative or planned community located in this Commonwealth."Service animal." As follows:(1) A dog individually trained to perform work or tasks:(i) for the benefit of an individual with a disability, including a physical, sensory, psychiatric, intellectual or other mental disability;(ii) directly related to the individual's 20260HB2696PN3775 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disability;(iii) including:(A) if the individual is blind or has low vision, providing navigation and similar tasks of spatial awareness;(B) if the individual is deaf or hard of hearing, alerting the individual to the presence of people or sounds;(C) providing nonviolent protection or rescue work;(D) pulling a wheelchair;(E) if the individual experiences seizures, providing assistance during a seizure;(F) alerting the individual to the presence of allergens;(G) retrieving items such as medicine, a telephone or other telecommunication device;(H) if the individual has a mobility disability, providing physical support and assistance with balance and stability; or(I) if the individual has a psychiatric or neurological disability, preventing or interrupting impulsive or destructive behaviors; and(iv) not including any crime deterrent effect of the dog's presence or the provision of emotional support, well-being, comfort or companionship.(2) The term does not include any other species of animal, whether wild or domestic, trained or untrained.Section 7. Sections 3 and 4 of the act are renumbered to read:20260HB2696PN3775 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section [3] 302. Documentation of disability and disability-related need.(a) Right to request documentation.--A landlord or association that receives a request from a person to make an exception to the landlord's or association's policy prohibiting animals or limiting the size, weight, breed or number of animals on the landlord's property or within property controlled by the association because the person requires the use of an assistance animal or service animal may require the person to produce documentation of the disability and disability-related need for the animal only if the disability or disability-related need is not readily apparent or known to the landlord or, in the case of an association, the executive board of the association.(b) Minimum standards.--Any documentation proving that a person is disabled and requires the use of an assistance animal or service animal as a reasonable accommodation in housing under the Fair Housing Act (Public Law 90-284, 42 U.S.C. § 3601 et seq.), the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (Public Law 93-112, 29 U.S.C. § 701 et seq.), the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327) or the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, or local law shall:(1) Be in writing.(2) Be reliable and based on direct knowledge of the person's disability and disability-related need for the assistance animal or service animal.(3) Describe the person's disability-related need for the assistance animal or service animal.Section [4] 303. Immunity.Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a landlord or 20260HB2696PN3775 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 association shall not be liable for injuries caused by a person's assistance animal or service animal permitted on the landlord's property or within property controlled by the association as a reasonable accommodation to assist the person with a disability under the Fair Housing Act (Public Law 90-284, 42 U.S.C. § 3601 et seq.), section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (Public Law 93-112, 29 U.S.C. § 701 et seq.), the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327), the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, or any other Federal, State or local law.Section 8. Sections 5 and 6 of the act are amended to read:Section [5] 304. Misrepresentation of entitlement to assistance animal or service animal in housing.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of misrepresentation of entitlement to assistance animal or service animal in housing if the person intentionally:(1) misrepresents to another that the person has a disability or disability-related need for the use of an assistance animal or service animal in housing; or(2) makes materially false statements for the purpose of obtaining documentation for the use of an assistance animal or service animal in housing.(b) Grading.--A person who violates the provisions of subsection (a) commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section [6] 305. Misrepresentation of animal as assistance animal or service animal in housing.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of misrepresentation of an animal as an assistance animal or service animal in housing if the person intentionally:20260HB2696PN3775 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) creates a document misrepresenting an animal as an assistance animal or service animal for use in housing;(2) provides a document to another falsely stating that an animal is an assistance animal or service animal for use in housing; or(3) fits an animal that is not an assistance animal or service animal with a harness, collar, vest or sign that indicates the animal is an assistance animal or service animal for use in housing.(b) Grading.--A person who violates the provisions of subsection (a) commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine not to exceed $1,000.Section 9. The act is amended by adding chapters to read:CHAPTER 5SERVICE DOGS IN PUBLIC ACCOMMODATIONSSection 501. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Individual with a disability." An individual who satisfies all of the following:(1) has a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activity;(2) has a history or record of an impairment described under paragraph (1); and(3) is perceived or known by other people as having an impairment as described under paragraph (1)."Public accommodation." The term shall have the same meaning as "public accommodation, resort or amusement" defined under section 4(l) of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), 20260HB2696PN3775 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act. The term does not include housing and the public areas of a residential rental community."Registered service dog." A service dog that has been issued a trained service dog card and is listed in the trained service dog card database."Service dog in training." A dog that is being individually trained to do work or perform tasks for the benefit of a qualified individual with a disability."Trained service dog card." An identification card issued by the department to indicate that a dog is a registered service dog that includes:(1) A specific insignia.(2) A photograph of the service dog.(3) A photograph of the owner of the service dog."Trained service dog patch." A patch with a specific insignia inscribed and issued by the department to indicate that a dog is a registered service dog."Trainer of a service dog." An individual who is training a service dog to do work or perform tasks for the benefit of an individual with a disability.Section 502. Trained service dog patch.(a) Duty of department.--The department shall develop, make and issue a trained service dog patch.(b) Eligibility.--For an individual with a disability to receive a trained service dog patch for their service dog, the individual with a disability shall provide to the department all of the following:(1) A completed registered service dog application form developed by the department.20260HB2696PN3775 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) An application fee set by the department. The application fee shall be limited to the cost of the trained service dog patch and trained service dog card.(3) An affidavit signed by the individual with a disability submitting the application certifying that the dog is a service dog. The affidavit must also be signed by a trainer, other than the applicant, and list the tasks the service dog is trained to perform.(4) Documentation from a health care provider demonstrating that the individual applying for the trained service dog patch is an individual with a disability who would benefit from a service dog. The documentation need not disclose a diagnosis.(c) Exception.--The department may promulgate regulations to develop a procedure to address situations in which the trainer documentation is not otherwise obtainable but the department receives information detailing that training of a service dog is sufficient.(d) Materials issued by department.--Within 45 days after the receipt of the eligibility information under subsection (b), the department shall issue the following materials to the individual with a disability:(1) A trained service dog patch capable of being affixed to clothing, collar or vest.(2) A trained service dog card. The trained service dog card shall expire after the death of the registered service dog.Section 503. Admittance of registered service dog to public accommodations.(a) Admission.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 20260HB2696PN3775 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a registered service dog shall be:(1) Admitted to any building open to the public.(2) Admitted to any public accommodation.(3) Allowed access to all common carriers.(b) Duty of owner or training.--A registered service dog or service dog in training shall remain under the control of an owner or a trainer of a service dog at all times in a public accommodation.(c) Denying access.--Regardless of a policy denying pets entry to a public accommodation or common carrier, an individual with a disability with a registered service dog may not be denied entry into a public accommodation or common carrier.(d) Additional entrance fee.--An individual with a registered service dog or a trainer of a service dog may not be required to pay any additional fee for admittance or usage because of the registered service dog.(e) Liability.--An individual with a disability with a registered service dog or a trainer of a service dog shall be liable for any property damage or personal injury caused by the registered service dog or service dog.Section 504. Trained service dog card database.(a) Duty of department.--The department shall develop a database containing records of all registered service dogs.(b) Information collected.--The database shall contain the following information about a registered service dog:(1) The name, breed, height and weight.(2) The age as of the date of issuance of the trained service dog card.(3) A description of the registered service dog's fur, including color, length and texture.20260HB2696PN3775 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) A copy of the affidavit submitted to the department under section 502(b)(3) and medical documentation provided under section 502(b)(4).(5) Date of issuance of the trained service dog card.Section 505. Immunity from liability.An owner of a public accommodation shall not be liable for a personal injury or property damage caused by a registered service dog or service dog in training so long as the personal injury or property damage has no causal relationship with the owner of a public accommodation's own negligence, recklessness or willful misconduct.Section 506. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this chapter.CHAPTER 7MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 701. Fraudulent misrepresentation of a service dog. A person is guilty of a summary offense if the person fraudulently misrepresents a dog as a service dog with the intention of bringing the dog into a place of public accommodation or obtaining other benefits.Section 10. Section 7 of the act is renumbered to read:Section [7] 702. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.Section 11. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2696PN3775 - 11 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425